Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CAPITOL CAMPUS IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin (a) $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for improvements to the Capitol campus as described in this section. This appropriation is available until the projects are completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin (b) $400,000 of the appropriation in paragraph (a) is for trees on the upper mall and the northern portion of the lower mall bordering Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard. new text end new text begin (c) $200,000 of the appropriation in paragraph (a) is for benches on the upper mall and the northern portion of the lower mall bordering Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard. new text end new text begin (d) $150,000 of the appropriation in paragraph (a) is for visual markers and welcome information for the Capitol campus, appropriately spaced for wayfinding of the major streets on the Capitol campus, anchoring a pathway to the State Capitol building and Capitol Mall that features interpretive markers honoring the importance and stature of the Capitol campus as both a historic site and as a modern, active public gathering place for all visitors. new text end new text begin (e) Upon substantial completion of a project authorized in paragraph (b), (c), or (d), and after written notice to the commissioner of management and budget, the commissioner of administration may use any money remaining from the project toward any other project in this section. new text end